Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 7. Periodic Tenancy, Holdover, and Abuse of Access.

Sec. 34.03.290.
Periodic tenancy and holdover.

While rent is current, the landlord or the tenant may terminate a week to week tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least 14 days before the termination date specified in the notice.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month to month tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least 30 days before the rental due date specified in the notice.

If the tenant remains in possession without the landlord’s consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or after its termination under (a) or (b) of this section, the landlord may, after serving a notice to quit to the tenant under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.105

, bring an action for possession and if the tenant’s holdover is wilful and not in good faith the landlord, in addition, may recover an amount not to exceed one and one-half times the actual damages. If the landlord consents to the tenant’s continued occupancy, AS

34.03.020

applies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 30 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.300.
Landlord and tenant remedies for abuse of access.

If the tenant refuses to allow lawful access, the landlord may obtain injunctive relief to compel access or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the landlord may recover an amount not to exceed the actual damages or one month’s periodic rent, whichever is greater. If the landlord terminates the rental agreement, the landlord shall give written notice to the tenant at least 10 days before the date specified in the notice.

If the landlord makes an unlawful entry or a lawful entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful but which have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the tenant may recover an amount not to exceed the actual damages or one month’s periodic rent, whichever is greater, court costs and reasonable attorney fees. If the tenant terminates the rental agreement, the tenant shall give written notice to the landlord at least 10 days before the date specified in the notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)